Utah statutes.
76-10-1609.   Prospective application.

The amendments to the Utah Pattern of Unlawful Activity Act are prospective in nature and apply only to civil causes of action accruing after the effective date of this act.  However, crimes committed prior to the effective date of this act may comprise part of a pattern of unlawful activity if at least one of the criminal episodes comprising that pattern occurs after the effective date of this act and the pattern otherwise meets the definition of pattern of unlawful activity as defined in Section 76-10-1602.



Enacted by Chapter 238, 1987 General Session

